District of Columbia statutes.
47-1814.05

Repealed

Persons engaging in a profession — Renewal.

Repealed.

July 16, 1947, 61 Stat. 358, ch. 258, art. I, title XIV, § 6
Mar. 6, 1979, D.C. Law 2-158, § 4, 25 DCR 7002
Sept. 10, 1992, D.C. Law 9-145, § 103(d), 39 DCR 4895
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1243(b), 46 DCR 3142
1981 Ed., § 47-1814.5.
1973 Ed., § 47-1591e.